Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-3526
Graded Egg Fund; transfer.

The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Graded Egg Fund to the Pure Food Cash Fund on August 24, 2017.

Laws 2017, LB134, § 13.